Illinois, session 104th, HB3818.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Court of Claims Act is amended by changing 5Sections 8 and 11 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 505/8)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.8)7    Sec. 8. Court of Claims jurisdiction; deliberation 8periods. The court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear 9and determine the following matters:10        (a) All claims against the State founded upon any law 11    of the State of Illinois or upon any regulation adopted 12    thereunder by an executive or administrative officer or 13    agency; provided, however, the court shall not have 14    jurisdiction (i) to hear or determine claims arising under 15    the Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 16    Diseases Act, or claims for expenses in civil litigation, 17    or (ii) to review administrative decisions for which a 18    statute provides that review shall be in the circuit or 19    appellate court.20        (b) All claims against the State founded upon any 21    contract entered into with the State of Illinois.22        (c) All claims against the State for time unjustly 23    served in prisons of this State, in a county jail, on   HB3818- 2 -LRB104 08464 JRC 18516 b1    parole, on intensive supervision probation, or on the sex 2    offender registry, when the unjustly convicted person 3    imprisoned received a pardon from the Governor stating 4    that such pardon is issued on the ground of innocence of 5    the crime for which he or she was convicted imprisoned or 6    he or she received a certificate of innocence from the 7    Circuit Court as provided in Section 2-702 of the Code of 8    Civil Procedure. The court shall make an award of $50,000 9    per year, and prorated for any partial year, during which 10    the person was wrongfully incarcerated in a State 11    correctional institution or in a county jail, including 12    the time the person was incarcerated awaiting trial, and 13    $25,000 for each year, and prorated for any partial year, 14    during which the person was wrongfully on parole, 15    wrongfully on intensive supervision probation, or was 16    wrongfully required to register as a sex offender. In 17    addition, the Circuit Court shall make an award of 18    reasonable attorney's fees, costs, and expenses in the 19    amount determined by the Circuit Court after awarding a 20    certificate of innocence under Section 2-702 of the Code 21    of Civil Procedure. The ; provided, the amount of the 22    award is at the discretion of the court; and provided, the 23    court shall make no award in excess of the following 24    amounts: for imprisonment of 5 years or less, not more 25    than $85,350; for imprisonment of 14 years or less but 26    over 5 years, not more than $170,000; for imprisonment of   HB3818- 3 -LRB104 08464 JRC 18516 b1    over 14 years, not more than $199,150; and provided 2    further, the court shall fix attorney's fees not to exceed 3    25% of the award granted. On or after the effective date of 4    this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly, the 5    court shall annually adjust the maximum awards authorized 6    by this subsection (c) to reflect the increase, if any, in 7    the Consumer Price Index For All Urban Consumers for the 8    previous calendar year, as determined by the United States 9    Department of Labor, except that no annual increment may 10    exceed 5%. For the annual adjustments, if the Consumer 11    Price Index decreases during a calendar year, there shall 12    be no adjustment for that calendar year. The transmission 13    by the Prisoner Review Board or the clerk of the circuit 14    court of the information described in Section 11(b) to the 15    clerk of the Court of Claims is conclusive evidence of the 16    validity of the claim. The changes made by this amendatory 17    Act of the 95th General Assembly apply to all claims 18    pending on or filed on or after the effective date. The 19    changes made by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 20    Assembly apply to all claims pending or filed on or after 21    the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 22    General Assembly. 23        (d) All claims against the State for damages in cases 24    sounding in tort, if a like cause of action would lie 25    against a private person or corporation in a civil suit, 26    and all like claims sounding in tort against the Medical   HB3818- 4 -LRB104 08464 JRC 18516 b1    Center Commission, the Board of Trustees of the University 2    of Illinois, the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois 3    University, the Board of Trustees of Chicago State 4    University, the Board of Trustees of Eastern Illinois 5    University, the Board of Trustees of Governors State 6    University, the Board of Trustees of Illinois State 7    University, the Board of Trustees of Northeastern Illinois 8    University, the Board of Trustees of Northern Illinois 9    University, the Board of Trustees of Western Illinois 10    University, or the Board of Trustees of the Illinois 11    Mathematics and Science Academy; provided, that an award 12    for damages in a case sounding in tort, other than certain 13    cases involving the operation of a State vehicle described 14    in this paragraph, shall not exceed the sum of $2,000,000 15    to or for the benefit of any claimant. The $2,000,000 16    limit prescribed by this Section does not apply to an 17    award of damages in any case sounding in tort arising out 18    of the operation by a State employee of a vehicle owned, 19    leased or controlled by the State. The defense that the 20    State or the Medical Center Commission or the Board of 21    Trustees of the University of Illinois, the Board of 22    Trustees of Southern Illinois University, the Board of 23    Trustees of Chicago State University, the Board of 24    Trustees of Eastern Illinois University, the Board of 25    Trustees of Governors State University, the Board of 26    Trustees of Illinois State University, the Board of   HB3818- 5 -LRB104 08464 JRC 18516 b1    Trustees of Northeastern Illinois University, the Board of 2    Trustees of Northern Illinois University, the Board of 3    Trustees of Western Illinois University, or the Board of 4    Trustees of the Illinois Mathematics and Science Academy 5    is not liable for the negligence of its officers, agents, 6    and employees in the course of their employment is not 7    applicable to the hearing and determination of such 8    claims. The changes to this Section made by this 9    amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly apply only to 10    claims filed on or after July 1, 2015.11        The court shall annually adjust the maximum awards 12    authorized by this subsection to reflect the increase, if 13    any, in the Consumer Price Index For All Urban Consumers 14    for the previous calendar year, as determined by the 15    United States Department of Labor. The Comptroller shall 16    make the new amount resulting from each annual adjustment 17    available to the public via the Comptroller's official 18    website by January 31 of every year. 19        (e) All claims for recoupment made by the State of 20    Illinois against any claimant.21        (f) All claims pursuant to the Line of Duty 22    Compensation Act. A claim under that Act must be heard and 23    determined within one year after the application for that 24    claim is filed with the Court as provided in that Act. 25        (g) All claims filed pursuant to the Crime Victims 26    Compensation Act.  HB3818- 6 -LRB104 08464 JRC 18516 b1        (h) All claims pursuant to the Illinois National 2    Guardsman's Compensation Act. A claim under that Act must 3    be heard and determined within one year after the 4    application for that claim is filed with the Court as 5    provided in that Act. 6        (i) All claims authorized by subsection (a) of Section 7    10-55 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act for the 8    expenses incurred by a party in a contested case on the 9    administrative level.10(Source: P.A. 100-1124, eff. 11-27-18.) 11    (705 ILCS 505/11)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.11)12    Sec. 11. Filing claims.13    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this 14Section and subsection (4) of Section 24, the claimant shall 15in all cases set forth fully in his petition the claim, the 16action thereon, if any, on behalf of the State, what persons 17are owners thereof or interested therein, when and upon what 18consideration such persons became so interested; that no 19assignment or transfer of the claim or any part thereof or 20interest therein has been made, except as stated in the 21petition; that the claimant is justly entitled to the amount 22therein claimed from the State of Illinois, after allowing all 23just credits; and that claimant believes the facts stated in 24the petition to be true. The petition shall be verified, as to 25statements of facts, by the affidavit of the claimant, his   HB3818- 7 -LRB104 08464 JRC 18516 b1agent, or attorney. 2    (b) Whenever a person has served a term of imprisonment 3and has received a pardon by the Governor stating that such 4pardon was issued on the ground of innocence of the crime for 5which he or she was convicted imprisoned, the Prisoner Review 6Board shall transmit this information to the clerk of the 7Court of Claims, together with the claimant's current address. 8Whenever a person has served a term of imprisonment and has 9received a certificate of innocence from the Circuit Court as 10provided in Section 2-702 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the 11clerk of the issuing Circuit Court shall transmit this 12information to the clerk of the Court of Claims, together with 13the claimant's current address. The clerk of the Court of 14Claims shall immediately docket the case for consideration by 15the Court of Claims, and shall provide notice to the claimant 16of such docketing together with all hearing dates and 17applicable deadlines. The Court of Claims shall hear the case 18and render a decision within 90 days after its docketing. 19(Source: P.A. 95-970, eff. 9-22-08; 96-328, eff. 8-11-09.) 20    Section 10. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 21changing Section 2-702 as follows: 22    (735 ILCS 5/2-702)23    Sec. 2-702. Petition for a certificate of innocence that 24the petitioner was innocent of all offenses for which he or she   HB3818- 8 -LRB104 08464 JRC 18516 b1was incarcerated.2    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that innocent 3persons who have been wrongly convicted of crimes in Illinois 4and subsequently imprisoned have been frustrated in seeking 5legal redress due to a variety of substantive and technical 6obstacles in the law and that such persons should have an 7available avenue to obtain a finding of innocence so that they 8may obtain relief through a petition in the Court of Claims. 9The General Assembly further finds misleading the current 10legal nomenclature which compels an innocent person to seek a 11pardon for being wrongfully incarcerated. It is the intent of 12the General Assembly that the court, in exercising its 13discretion as permitted by law regarding the weight and 14admissibility of evidence submitted pursuant to this Section, 15shall, in the interest of justice, give due consideration to 16difficulties of proof caused by the passage of time, the death 17or unavailability of witnesses, the destruction of evidence or 18other factors not caused by such persons or those acting on 19their behalf.20    (b) Any person who is convicted or adjudicated a 21delinquent and subsequently serves any part of a sentence of 22incarceration in a State correctional institution or in a 23county jail, of parole, of intensive supervision probation, or 24of registration as a sex offender imprisoned for one or more 25felonies by the State of Illinois which he or she did not 26commit may, under the conditions hereinafter provided, file a   HB3818- 9 -LRB104 08464 JRC 18516 b1petition for certificate of innocence in the circuit court of 2the county in which the person was convicted or adjudicated a 3delinquent. The petition shall request a certificate of 4innocence finding that the petitioner was innocent of one or 5more all offenses for which he or she was convicted 6incarcerated.7    (c) In order to present the claim for certificate of 8innocence of an unjust conviction or juvenile delinquency 9adjudication and imprisonment, the petitioner must attach to 10his or her petition documentation demonstrating that:11        (1) he or she has been convicted or adjudicated a 12    delinquent of one or more felonies by the State of 13    Illinois and subsequently sentenced to a term of 14    imprisonment, and has served all or any part of the 15    sentence; and16        (2) his or her judgment of conviction or delinquency 17    adjudication was reversed or vacated, and the indictment, 18    or information, or petition dismissed or, if a new trial 19    was ordered, either he or she was found not guilty at the 20    new trial or he or she was not retried and the indictment, 21    or information, or petition dismissed; or the statute, or 22    application thereof, on which the indictment or 23    information was based violated the Constitution of the 24    United States or the State of Illinois; and25        (3) his or her claim is not time barred by the 26    provisions of subsection (i) of this Section.  HB3818- 10 -LRB104 08464 JRC 18516 b1    (d) The petition shall state facts in sufficient detail to 2permit the court to find that the petitioner is likely to 3succeed at trial in proving that the petitioner is innocent of 4the alleged offenses for which he or she was convicted or 5adjudicated a delinquent charged in the indictment or 6information or his or her acts or omissions charged in the 7indictment or information did not constitute a felony or 8misdemeanor against the State of Illinois, and the petitioner 9did not by his or her own conduct voluntarily cause or bring 10about his or her conviction or juvenile delinquency 11adjudication. Neither a guilty plea nor a confession 12constitutes conduct causing or bringing about one's conviction 13or delinquency adjudication. The petition shall be verified by 14the petitioner.15    (e) A copy of the petition shall be served on the Attorney 16General and the State's Attorney of the county where the 17conviction or juvenile delinquency adjudication was had. The 18Attorney General and the State's Attorney of the county where 19the conviction or juvenile delinquency adjudication was had 20shall have the right to intervene as parties.21    (f) In any hearing seeking a certificate of innocence, the 22court may take judicial notice of prior sworn testimony or 23evidence admitted in the criminal or juvenile delinquency 24proceedings related to the convictions or adjudications which 25resulted in the alleged wrongful incarceration, if the 26petitioner was either represented by counsel at such prior   HB3818- 11 -LRB104 08464 JRC 18516 b1proceedings or the right to counsel was knowingly waived.2    (g) In order to obtain a certificate of innocence the 3petitioner must prove by a preponderance of evidence that:4        (1) the petitioner was convicted or adjudicated a 5    delinquent of one or more felonies by the State of 6    Illinois and subsequently sentenced to a term of 7    imprisonment, and has served all or any part of the 8    sentence;9        (2)(A) the judgment of conviction or adjudication was 10    reversed or vacated, and the indictment, or information, 11    or petition dismissed or, if a new trial was ordered, 12    either the petitioner was found not guilty at the new 13    trial or the petitioner was not retried and the 14    indictment, or information, or petition dismissed; or (B) 15    the statute, or application thereof, on which the 16    indictment, or information, or petition was based violated 17    the Constitution of the United States or the State of 18    Illinois;19        (3) the petitioner is innocent of one or more of the 20    offenses for which he or she was convicted or adjudicated 21    a delinquent charged in the indictment or information or 22    his or her acts or omissions charged in the indictment or 23    information did not constitute a felony or misdemeanor 24    against the State; and25        (4) the petitioner did not by his or her own conduct 26    voluntarily cause or bring about his or her conviction or   HB3818- 12 -LRB104 08464 JRC 18516 b1    juvenile delinquency adjudication. Neither a guilty plea 2    nor a confession constitutes conduct causing or bringing 3    about one's conviction or delinquency adjudication.4    (h) If the court finds that the petitioner is entitled to a 5judgment, it shall enter a certificate of innocence finding 6that the petitioner was innocent of one or more all offenses 7for which he or she was convicted or adjudicated a delinquent. 8The court shall also make a determination, subject to proof by 9the claimant, of the reasonable attorney's fees, costs, and 10expenses incurred by the claimant in connection with obtaining 11the certificate of innocence under this Section incarcerated. 12Upon entry of the certificate of innocence or pardon from the 13Governor stating that such pardon was issued on the ground of 14innocence of the crime for which he or she was convicted or 15adjudicated a delinquent imprisoned, (1) the clerk of the 16court shall transmit a copy of the certificate of innocence to 17the clerk of the Court of Claims, together with the claimant's 18current address; and (2) the court shall enter an order 19expunging the record of arrest from the official records of 20the arresting authority and order that the records of the 21clerk of the circuit court and the Illinois State Police be 22sealed until further order of the court upon good cause shown 23or as otherwise provided herein, and the name of the defendant 24or respondent in a juvenile delinquency proceeding obliterated 25from the official index requested to be kept by the circuit 26court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts Act in   HB3818- 13 -LRB104 08464 JRC 18516 b1connection with the arrest and conviction or delinquency 2adjudication for the offense but the order shall not affect 3any index issued by the circuit court clerk before the entry of 4the order. The court shall enter the expungement order 5regardless of whether the petitioner has prior criminal 6convictions or delinquency adjudications. 7    All records sealed by the Illinois State Police may be 8disseminated by the Department only as required by law or to 9the arresting authority, the State's Attorney, the court upon 10a later arrest for the same or similar offense, or for the 11purpose of sentencing for any subsequent felony. Upon 12conviction for any subsequent offense, the Department of 13Corrections shall have access to all sealed records of the 14Department pertaining to that individual. 15    Upon entry of the order of expungement, the clerk of the 16circuit court shall promptly mail a copy of the order to the 17person whose records were expunged and sealed. The clerk shall 18post in the common areas of the courthouse a notice containing 19information about grants for exonerated persons and their 20dependents under Section 62 of the Higher Education Student 21Assistance Act, including the Internet address of the Illinois 22Student Assistance Commission. The Illinois Student Assistance 23Commission shall develop a uniform statewide notice and 24provide the format of the notice to each clerk. 25    (i) Any person seeking a certificate of innocence under 26this Section based on the dismissal of an indictment or   HB3818- 14 -LRB104 08464 JRC 18516 b1information or acquittal that occurred before the effective 2date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly shall 3file his or her petition within 2 years after the effective 4date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly. Any 5person seeking a certificate of innocence under this Section 6based on the dismissal of an indictment or information or 7acquittal that occurred on or after the effective date of this 8amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly shall file his or 9her petition within 2 years after the dismissal or acquittal. 10Any person seeking a certificate of innocence under this 11Section based on the dismissal of a juvenile delinquency 12petition or an acquittal on such petition that occurred before 13the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 14Assembly, including a petitioner whose petition was denied 15solely on the basis that this Section did not formerly apply to 16juvenile delinquency adjudications, shall file his or her 17petition within 4 years after the effective date of this 18amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. Any person 19seeking a certificate of innocence under this Section based on 20the dismissal of a juvenile delinquency petition or an 21acquittal on such petition that occurred on or after the 22effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 23Assembly shall file his or her petition within 2 years after 24the dismissal or acquittal.25    (j) The decision to grant or deny a certificate of 26innocence shall be binding only with respect to claims filed   HB3818- 15 -LRB104 08464 JRC 18516 b1in the Court of Claims and shall not have a res judicata effect 2on any other proceedings.3(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-1046, eff. 1-1-25.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.